Utah statutes.
77-30-7.   Governor's warrant of arrest -- Recitals.

If the governor decides that the demand should be complied with he shall sign a warrant of arrest, which shall be sealed with the state seal, directed to any peace officer or other person whom he may think fit to entrust with the execution thereof. The warrant must substantially recite the facts necessary to the validity of its issuance.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

